Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 1. Declaration of Rights
§ 11. Self-incrimination; jeopardy.

No person
shall be compelled to testify against himself in any criminal case,
nor shall any person be twice put in jeopardy for the same offense.
If a jury disagree, or if the judgment be arrested after a verdict,
or if the judgment be reversed for error in law, the accused shall
not be deemed to have been in jeopardy.

Cross references. —

As to testimony of criminal defendant, see §

7-11-401

.

Punishment for felony murder and underlying felony unconstitutional.—

District court erred when it sentenced defendant to life in prison with the opportunity for parole for felony murder and a concurrent sentence of a term if imprisonment for the underlying offense of aggravated child abuse because the imposition of multiple punishments for felony murder and the underlying felony violated the Double Jeopardy Clauses of the United States and Wyoming Constitutions. Hartley v. State, 2020 WY 40, 460 P.3d 716,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 2020).

Improper dual sexual assault convictions under same statute. —

When defendant was convicted under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-303(a)(vi) and (viii), one of the convictions had to be vacated because (1) the convictions resulted from disjunctive charges under the same statute and were based on a single criminal act, so (2) the legislature presumably intended only one conviction. Solis v. State, 2013 WY 152, 315 P.3d 622,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2013).

Nature of privilege. —

The privilege against self-incrimination is that the person shall not be compelled to testify. Dryden v. State, 535 P.2d 483,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1975).

The constitutional privilege against self-incrimination is that the evidence shall not be extorted. Dryden v. State, 535 P.2d 483,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1975).

There are two basic reasons for enforcement of right against
self-incrimination. —

to safeguard against fear and torture so that there will not be extorted expressions of untruth and to prevent the state from depriving a person of the freedom to decide whether to assist the state in securing his conviction. Abeyta v. State, 592 P.2d 705,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 388

(Wyo. 1979).

Protection provided. —

This section assures the same protection as the federal constitution. State v. Keffer, 860 P.2d 1118,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 1993).

Section does not prohibit court from compelling defendant to furnish handwriting exemplars.

Brunmeier v. State, 733 P.2d 265,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 403

(Wyo. 1987).

Court may not require defendant to speak. —

A defendant's choice to exercise his right to allocution is entirely voluntary; he can speak to the court, but he is not required to do so; a defendant's statements may be admissible against him in further proceedings, provided they are voluntary. Harvey v. State, 835 P.2d 1074,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1992), reh'g denied,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. July 8, 1992), cert. denied, 506 U.S. 1022, 113 S. Ct. 661, 121 L. Ed. 2d 586, 1992 U.S. LEXIS 7732 (U.S. 1992).

Pre-arrest right to silence. —

The state constitutional language itself protects an accused's right to silence and the existence of that right does not depend upon

Miranda

advice. The constitutional right to silence exists at all times: before arrest, at arrest, and after arrest; before a

Miranda

warning and after it. The right is self-executing. Tortolito v. State, 901 P.2d 387,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 1995).

Effect of Miranda. —

The decision of the supreme court of the United States in Miranda v. Arizona, 384 U.S. 436, 86 S. Ct. 1602, 16 L. Ed. 2d 694, 1966 U.S. LEXIS 2817, 10 A.L.R.3d 974 (1966) is pertinent in the construction that the state supreme court should give to the state constitutional provision. Dryden v. State, 535 P.2d 483,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1975).

Implicit in the

Miranda

warning is the assurance that silence will carry no penalty, and use for impeachment purposes of defendant's silence, at time of arrest, after

Miranda

warnings violates the due process clause of the fourteenth amendment of the federal constitution.Irvin v. State, 560 P.2d 372,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 231

(Wyo. 1977).

Defendant's lies about the assailant's identity were inadmissible where defendant had not been read the Miranda warnings. Lewis v. State, 2002 WY 92, 48 P.3d 1063,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 2002).

Right to remain silent does not depend on being advised of
right. —

The right of an accused to remain silent under this section of the Wyoming constitution does not depend upon his being advised of that right, but exists by virtue of the constitutional language. Clenin v. State, 573 P.2d 844,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 258

(Wyo. 1978), limited, Summers v. State, 725 P.2d 1033,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 614

(Wyo. 1986).

Purpose of such advice. —

Advice as to the right of an accused to remain silent by law enforcement officers or by the justice of the peace or by the judge of the district court is only for the purpose of expanding its protection by assuring that the accused person is aware of it. Clenin v. State, 573 P.2d 844,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 258

(Wyo. 1978), limited, Summers v. State, 725 P.2d 1033,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 614

(Wyo. 1986).

Incriminating statement, not product of interrogation, admissible.
—

A murder defendant's statement that he went outside his house to fight the victim and then stabbed the victim by reflex was admissible, where it was not the product of an interrogation and the police were merely informing the defendant of the charges against him when he made the statement. Ramos v. State, 806 P.2d 822,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1991), reh'g denied,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. Mar. 15, 1991).

Interrogation. —

To determine whether an accused was in custody during an interrogation, two distinct inquiries are required, one into the circumstances surrounding the interrogation and one into whether a reasonable person would have felt at liberty to terminate the interrogation and leave. Kolb v. State, 930 P.2d 1238,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1996).

Because defendant, who was convicted of indecent liberties with a child, was not in custody when questioned at his residence by the police, no Miranda warnings were required, and the statements made by defendant during a custodial interview at the sheriff's office were made voluntarily, where the defendant pointed to no evidence in the record to support a showing of coercive government action. Gunn v. State, 2003 WY 24, 64 P.3d 716,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 2003).

Defendant's statements to police did not violate his self-incrimination rights where the detective characterized the interrogation as her posing questions to defendant and he ‘answered if he wanted to.’ He took advantage of that option by refusing to identify his supplier or customers, despite the fact the occupants were watched to ensure that no evidence was compromised, they were allowed to do what they pleased, defendant apparently slept for a great deal of the time the officers searched the premises, and, when he needed to relieve himself, the officers respected his choice to go outside rather than be accompanied to the restroom by an officer. Gompf v. State, 2005 WY 112, 120 P.3d 980,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 2005).

Counsel was not ineffective for failing to file a motion to suppress defendant's statements to officers because defendant did not demonstrate that a suppression motion based on the alleged Miranda violation would have been granted as it did not appear that defendant was subjected to express questioning, or its functional equivalent, prior to being advised of his Miranda rights. After he was arrested, an officer located defendant in a patrol vehicle, read him his Miranda rights, and defendant indicated that he understood his rights and that he wanted to waive those rights and make a statement. Grissom v. State, 2005 WY 132, 121 P.3d 127,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 2005).

No error in failing to suppress non-custodial interrogation.
—

In defendant's sexual assault case, a court did not err by denying defendant's motion to suppress his confession where the confession was non-custodial because he went to the station of his own will, he was told he did not have to answer questions, would not be arrested that day, and was free to leave at any time. In addition, the confession was voluntary as the trial court held a full evidentiary hearing on defendant's motion to suppress the statements and had the opportunity to hear the witness' testimony and weigh their credibility. Hannon v. State, 2004 WY 8, 84 P.3d 320,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2004).

Statements made with awareness of consequences admissible.
—

The court properly limited the admissibility of statements made by the defendant to investigating officers to those that were furnished prior to the advice that the victim had died. These statements were the product of uncoerced choice and demonstrated sufficient comprehension to assure that the waiver of the defendant's right to silence was made with full awareness of both the nature of his right and the consequences of his decision. Cutbirth v. State, 751 P.2d 1257,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1988).

Violation of the right against self-incrimination results in a void, not merely erroneous, judgment.

Dryden v. State, 535 P.2d 483,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1975); Jerskey v. State, 546 P.2d 173,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 1976).

Right against self-incrimination depends upon facts. —

Under what circumstances a witness shall be protected in refusing to answer necessarily depends in a great measure upon the facts adduced in the case. Miskimins v. Shaver, 8 Wyo. 392, 58 P. 411,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1899).

Failure to respond to repeated statements of the defendant that he desired counsel

was a violation of defendant's constitutional rights. Dryden v. State, 535 P.2d 483,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1975).

Equivocal request for counsel. —

Admission of defendant's statements at trial did not violate his rights under this section, where his question concerning the availability of an attorney was an equivocal request for counsel and did not affect the validity of his subsequent waiver of his constitutional rights. Best v. State, 736 P.2d 739,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 438

(Wyo. 1987).

Even if it was assumed that the defendant, charged with second-degree murder, was improperly questioned by the police after an equivocal request for counsel, his statements did not rise to the level of plain error. The defendant did make inconsistent statements during the interview about how the victim received his injuries; however, he emphatically denied killing the victim throughout the interview, and there was abundant evidence in the record that the defendant did in fact kill the victim. Suliber v. State, 866 P.2d 85,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 1993).

Later, proper examination could not correct earlier, improper
examination. —

Having previously failed properly to advise the accused of his privilege not to testify against himself, and knowing of the accused's desire for counsel, investigating officers could not continue to examine him and could not, by finally coming up with a proper warning and an apparently freely made statement, clear away the debris of the earlier and improper examinations. Dryden v. State, 535 P.2d 483,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1975).

Later Miranda confession admissible after unwarned statements
excluded. —

Where defendant's post-Miranda, voluntary statement confirmed that defendant had provided false statements to the police with the intent to hinder, delay, or obstruct their investigation and render assistance to the assailant, the improper admission of defendant's unwarned statements did not have a substantial and injurious effect or influence on the jury, so the admission of the evidence was harmless error. Lewis v. State, 2002 WY 92, 48 P.3d 1063,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 2002).

Immunity under this section is complete unless waived

by the witness with knowledge of his rights. Dryden v. State, 535 P.2d 483,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1975).

Prior convictions of felonies not to be considered as factor
in waiver. —

The supreme court rejected the argument that a factor which might be considered in whether there was a knowing and intelligent waiver of counsel is the fact that defendant had been convicted of felonies on three prior occasions. Dryden v. State, 535 P.2d 483,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1975).

Voluntary statements are those which proceed from spontaneous suggestion

of the party's own mind, free from the influence of any extraneous disturbing cause. Dryden v. State, 535 P.2d 483,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1975).

Voluntariness of confession. —

In an indecent act case, a court did not err by denying defendant's motion to suppress because defendant's confession was voluntary where he went to the police station at the request of a police officer, but he was not under arrest, he was given Miranda warnings before the interview commenced, which he waived, and although the police officer was insistent and persistent in his questioning, he did not force defendant to answer questions. Goulart v. State, 2003 WY 108, 76 P.3d 1230,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2003).

Confession was properly admitted where defendant arrived at the police station voluntarily, he was given his Miranda warnings, there was no suggestion that any of the officers questioned defendant after he requested counsel, and his first attempt to initiate re-contact with the officers failed because they would not speak with him unless he signed a request for contact form, which he was reluctant to do. Bhutto v. State, 2005 WY 78, 114 P.3d 1252,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 2005).

Defendant's voluntary statements not basis for suppression.
—

In defendant's second degree murder case, defendant's constitutional rights were not violated because the trial court refused to suppress his statements to police where: (1) defendant's statements to police, when he was asked to go to the police station and make a statement, were voluntary as was his waiver of Miranda rights that occurred about five minutes after police began his interview, and (2) inquiry ceased when defendant asked about obtaining a lawyer and specified one by name. Lopez v. State, 2004 WY 28, 86 P.3d 851,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 2004).

Statements held to be voluntary. —

Although defendant was not experienced with law enforcement and was of below average intelligence, where there was no evidence that he was unusually susceptible to coercion or easily influenced by police detective, and he indicated before he confessed that no promises were made to him by detective, his confession was voluntary. Simmers v. State, 943 P.2d 1189,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 1997).

Defendant's statement to police was voluntary where his car was not ‘blocked in’ by the officers, he was informed that he was not under arrest and that he did not have to talk to the officers, the officers were in plain clothes, and the entire encounter lasted less than thirty minutes. Jelle v. State, 2005 WY 111, 119 P.3d 403,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 2005).

Defendant's statement to law enforcement officers was voluntarily given; there was no evidence that officers or prosecutor intimidated defendant or improperly induced him to sign immunity agreement in exchange for his statement, and prosecutor was justified in later nullifying agreement on grounds that defendant's statement proved to be substantially incorrect. Edwards v. State, 973 P.2d 41,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1999).

Defendant's statements to police were knowing and voluntary and trial court correctly denied his motions to suppress; although police interview occurred eleven hours after defendant was first advised of his Miranda rights and after surgery to defendant's hand, officer partially re-advised defendant of his rights and defendant acknowledged that he remembered and understood the prior warning, and defendant presented no evidence demonstrating his statements were involuntary. Mitchell v. State, 982 P.2d 717,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 1999).

There was no error in the trial court's determination that the defendant's statements/confessions were voluntary where (1) the only allegation of coercion arose from the defendant's subjective perception that if he cooperated/confessed, then his children would be returned to him, but the district court resolved that evidentiary dispute in favor of the state, (2) there was no indication that the defendant's mental state was impaired, other than the natural anxiety a defendant might feel where drugs are found in his home and he has been involved in the distribution of those drugs, and (3) the defendant was read his Miranda rights, and he was given the opportunity to speak with a lawyer if he chose. Lara v. State, 2001 WY 53, 25 P.3d 507,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 2001).

Where an officer approached defendant with a drawn gun, defendant was escorted across the street and questioned, and, after being read Miranda rights, defendant confessed involvement in possession of marijuana, the confession was voluntary. Eckenrod v. State, 2003 WY 51, 67 P.3d 635,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 2003).

In a murder case, a court properly denied defendant's motion to suppress his statements where they were voluntary; the officers properly complied with Miranda, and defendant understood English, he was read his rights, he clearly indicated that he understood those rights, and defendant's responses indicated no confusion on his part. Pena v. State, 2004 WY 115, 98 P.3d 857,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 2004).

In a murder case, a court properly denied defendant's motion to suppress his statements where he did not affirmatively invoke his right to remain silent. Defendant's statements that he did “not really” want to talk to the officers and that he had nothing to tell the officers were not unambiguous invocations of his right to remain silent. Pena v. State, 2004 WY 115, 98 P.3d 857,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 2004).

A motion to suppress a confession was properly denied in a case involving sexual assault because it was voluntarily given; defendant was not promised probation, and defendant's nervousness and learning disability were not relevant since very simple “yes” or “no” questions were asked, and the process was thoroughly explained. Wilkins v. State, 2005 WY 2, 104 P.3d 85,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 2005).

Defendant's statements to police did not violate his self-incrimination rights where the detective characterized the interrogation as her posing questions to defendant and he ‘answered if he wanted to.’ He took advantage of that option by refusing to identify his supplier or customers, despite the fact the occupants were watched to ensure that no evidence was compromised, they were allowed to do what they pleased, defendant apparently slept for a great deal of the time the officers searched the premises, and, when he needed to relieve himself, the officers respected his choice to go outside rather than be accompanied to the restroom by an officer. Gompf v. State, 2005 WY 112, 120 P.3d 980,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 2005).

Defendant's statement to police was voluntary where his car was not ‘blocked in’ by the officers, he was informed that he was not under arrest and that he did not have to talk to the officers, the officers were in plain clothes, and the entire encounter lasted less than thirty minutes. Jelle v. State, 2005 WY 111, 119 P.3d 403,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 2005).

Statements while intoxicated were voluntary. —

In a case where defendant gave a confession to taking indecent liberties with a minor, a motion to suppress evidence was properly denied. Although witnesses testified that defendant was intoxicated both before and after the interview, this was not enough to justify suppression where defendant gave appropriate answers and appeared to have understood the questions posed during the interview, and defendant initiated contact with police after requesting an attorney. The fact that defendant might have been led to believe that his leaving after the questioning was a possibility was not sufficient evidence of coercion. Gordon v. State, 2004 WY 105, 97 P.3d 64,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 2004).

Burden on state to show voluntary character of statement. —

Self-incriminating statements are not per se admissible over objection, when the evidence discloses that the defendant was in custody for the crime charged at the time of making such statements, unless shown to have been voluntarily made. There is no presumption that such statements are voluntarily made, but, on the contrary, the presumption is the other way, and upon the trial of an accused the burden is upon the state, seeking to prove such statements, to show their voluntary character. Dryden v. State, 535 P.2d 483,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1975).

The burden of proof of voluntariness and waiver is on the state. Jerskey v. State, 546 P.2d 173,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 1976).

Prosecution has burden of proving by a preponderance of evidence that a defendant's statement to law enforcement officers was voluntarily made. Edwards v. State, 973 P.2d 41,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1999).

When a district court does not have the evidence to make a determination that coercion did or did not cause the defendant to make a statement, it has no choice but to decide that the state has not rebutted the presumption that the statement was involuntary. State v. Evans, 944 P.2d 1120,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1997).

Showing required of voluntary character of statement. —

The voluntary character of the statement where the accused is under arrest cannot be shown without also showing that he had the benefit of counsel or was fully informed of his rights. Dryden v. State, 535 P.2d 483,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1975).

The question is not whether the examining officers have been “unfair” to the accused; it is whether the state has proved that the statements were freely made by an informed and knowledgeable accused after full and proper warning as to his constitutional rights. Dryden v. State, 535 P.2d 483,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1975).

To support the state's position that a defendant was not threatened or promised anything in such a way as to coerce a confession, the state must supply the court with details of all relevant circumstances as well as the interrogating officer's reasons for believing the defendant appeared to freely decide for himself to forego the assistance of counsel and provide an incriminating statement. State v. Evans, 944 P.2d 1120,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1997).

There must be separate fair hearing and reliable determination on issue of voluntariness

in front of the judge alone before the statements may be received in evidence at the trial for jury consideration. Dodge v. State, 562 P.2d 303,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 243

(Wyo. 1977).

Standard of proof for determining voluntariness of confessions

is that of preponderance of the evidence. Dodge v. State, 562 P.2d 303,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 243

(Wyo. 1977).

Knowing and intelligent waiver of self-incrimination. —

Police agents could reasonably interpret a fully Mirandized defendant's statement that he knew and had visited a suspected drug associate for innocent reasons, as being an initiatory expression of willingness to engage in a generalized discussion regarding the investigation. Wells v. State, 846 P.2d 589,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1992).

Right against self-incrimination is sacred. —

No constitutional right of an accused person is more sacred than his right not to make a statement or testify against himself. Gabrielson v. State, 510 P.2d 534,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1973).

And it is highly improper for any comment or question to be made or asked pertaining thereto.

Gabrielson v. State, 510 P.2d 534,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1973).

Prosecution may not make reference to defendant's failure to take the stand

in his own defense. Boyd v. State, 528 P.2d 287,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 247

(Wyo. 1974), cert. denied, 423 U.S. 871, 96 S. Ct. 137, 46 L. Ed. 2d 102, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 2819 (U.S. 1975).

It is improper and reversible error to comment on the failure of a defendant to testify in his own behalf, and the test is whether the language used was manifestly intended or was of such character that the jury would naturally and necessarily take it to be a comment on the failure of the accused to testify. Oldham v. State, 534 P.2d 107,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 1975).

But the rule does not extend to comments on the state of the evidence,

or on the failure of the defense to introduce material evidence, or to call logical witnesses. Boyd v. State, 528 P.2d 287,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 247

(Wyo. 1974), cert. denied, 423 U.S. 871, 96 S. Ct. 137, 46 L. Ed. 2d 102, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 2819 (U.S. 1975).

It is not improper for the government to draw attention to the failure of lack of evidence on a point if it is not intended to call attention to the failure of the defendant to testify. Oldham v. State, 534 P.2d 107,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 1975).

Any comment upon accused's exercise of his right to remain silent is prejudicial error

which will entitle the accused to a reversal of the conviction. Westmark v. State, 693 P.2d 220,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 354

(Wyo. 1984), limited, Summers v. State, 725 P.2d 1033,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 614

(Wyo. 1986).

Comment on defendant's silence. —

In a domestic abuse case, the prosecutor violated defendant's constitutional rights where he repeatedly commented on defendant's pre-arrest silence, and stated that, in talking with the officer, there was “no explanation of innocence” by defendant. Spinner v. State, 2003 WY 106, 75 P.3d 1016,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 2003).

Prosecutor did not improperly comment on defendant's right to remain silent, where prosecutor elicited testimony to reconstruct defendant's behavior during his initial encounter with law enforcement, and drew attention only to defendant's reluctance to leave the victim alone with the deputies; testimony did not indicate that defendant not want to talk to the deputies. Lessard v. State, 2007 WY 89, 158 P.3d 698,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2007).

Prosecutor did not improperly comment on defendant's right to remain silent, based on admission of the transcript of defendant's post-arrest statement that contained a request for counsel. and request to have a DNA test; the context of defendant's request for counsel indicated that defendant wanted an attorney in an attempt to force a detective to conduct a DNA test, not to protect his right to silence or hide his guilt. There was nothing in the record indicating that the prosecutor used that statement for the prohibited inference of guilt from silence.
Lessard v. State, 2007 WY 89, 158 P.3d 698,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2007).

Prosecutor's statements did not implicate defendant's right to remain silent, and therefore defendant did not establish plain error, where they merely informed the jury that a confession was not required to convict a defendant. Collins v. State, 2015 WY 92, 354 P.3d 55,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 2015).

Viewing it in context, the prosecutor’s comment that the only person willing to explain how defendant’s semen ended up inside of the victim is the victim, did not constitute a direct or indirect comment on defendant’s failure to testify. Ridinger v. State, 2021 WY 4, 478 P.3d 1160,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 2021).

Court upheld defendant's conviction for assault and battery where an officer's testimony concerning defendant's refusal to talk to him did not reflect an intent to cast guilt upon defendant in violation of her constitutional right to remain silent. Cazier v. State, 2006 WY 153, 148 P.3d 23,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 2006).

Prosecution does not violate defendant's privilege against self-incrimination or commit prosecutorial misconduct by eliciting testimony about, or commenting upon, his refusal to voluntarily provide a sample for DNA testing.
Smith v. State, 2009 WY 2, 199 P.3d 1052,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2009).

Reversal for prosecutorial comment on silence. —

Since the right to remain silent is a self-executing right, an accused is presumed to be exercising the right by his silence, pre-arrest and pre-

Miranda

when questioned by the state's agents for purposes of a criminal investigation; accordingly, the prosecutorial use of the citizen's silence to infer the guilt of the citizen is constitutionally prohibited. Prosecutorial violations are subject to the mandate that failure to respect the constitutional right of the citizen-accused not to have his silence called to the attention of the jury will entitle the accused to a reversal of conviction. Tortolito v. State, 901 P.2d 387,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 1995).

Error to inform jury of defendant's refusal to take lie detector
test. —

It was error to inform the jury, through the admission of the defendant's videotaped deposition, of his refusal to submit to a lie detector test. The error was repeated when, after objection, the videotape was edited to contain only the refusal to take a lie detector test, without the accompanying explanation, and sent to the jury room to be viewed during deliberations. Schmunk v. State, 714 P.2d 724,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 482

(Wyo. 1986).

Refusal to provide DNA sample admissible. —

Neither U.S. Const. amend. V nor Wyo. Const. art. I, § 11, are implicated when a trial court admits into evidence a defendant's refusal to provide a DNA sample and allows a prosecutor to argue that such refusal is indicative of guilt.
Smith v. State, 2009 WY 2, 199 P.3d 1052,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2009).

Comment upon the defendant's failure to testify at trial can be held to be nonprejudicial

only where it can be shown beyond reasonable doubt to have been harmless and not to have contributed to a conviction. Jerskey v. State, 546 P.2d 173,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 1976).

Statement in closing argument did not constitute comment. —

Statement in prosecutor's closing argument that defendant's only witness wasn't even there when events occurred and that she was speculating as to what happened was not a comment on defendant's failure to testify. Stanton v. State, 692 P.2d 947,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 355

(Wyo. 1984).

Comments upon silence of accused prior to arrest not prejudicial
error. —

The rule established in Clenin v. State, 573 P.2d 844,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 258

(Wyo. 1978), overruled on other grounds, Richter v. State, 642 P.2d 1269,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1982) and Westmark v. State, 693 P.2d 220,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 354

(Wyo. 1984) to the effect that any comment upon the accused's exercise of his right to remain silent is prejudicial error, is limited to comments upon the silence of the accused either after his arrest or after he has been advised of his constitutional right to remain silent. Summers v. State, 725 P.2d 1033,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 614

(Wyo. 1986).

The arresting officer's references to the defendant's initial silence when the officer encountered him were not comments upon the defendant's exercise of the right to silence; the fact that the appellant initially ignored the officer and failed to respond to him was presented in direct testimony simply as part of the circumstances under which the officer first encountered the defendant and continued his contact with him, the questions and answers had nothing to do with the crime itself, and the prosecutor did not mention in opening or argue in closing that the appellant's silence somehow proved guilt. Lancaster v. State, 2002 WY 45, 43 P.3d 80,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 2002), overruled in part, Jones v. State, 2019 WY 45, 439 P.3d 753,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2019).

Where the prosecutor asked only one question concerning whether the inmate responded when told why he had been arrested, the prosecutor did not attempt to use the inmate's silence to the state's advantage and did not argue to the jury that the inmate's silence was evidence of or an admission of guilt. Thus, the inmate's right to silence pursuant to Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 11 was not violated. Abeyta v. State, 2003 WY 136, 78 P.3d 664,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 2003).

Cross-examination of defendant concerning his failure to tell law enforcement officers or the county attorney of his alibi defense

constituted impermissible comment on defendant's exercise of the right to remain silent and therefore violated this section of the state constitution. Clenin v. State, 573 P.2d 844,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 258

(Wyo. 1978), limited, Summers v. State, 725 P.2d 1033,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 614

(Wyo. 1986).

Standard by which court determines whether or not prosecutor has made impermissible comment

on the failure of the accused to testify is whether the language used was manifestly intended or was of such character that the jury would naturally and necessarily take it to be a comment on the failure of the accused to testify. Cyrus v. State, 639 P.2d 900,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1982).

Prosecutor's closing argument, allegedly containing comment
on right of silence, considered in entirety. —

In reaching a conclusion with respect to whether there was an impermissible comment upon the defendant's exercise of his right of silence, the supreme court must consider the closing argument in its entirety and is not permitted to take sentences and phrases out of context. Cheatham v. State, 719 P.2d 612,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 553

(Wyo. 1986).

Prosecutor may not emphasize defendant's refusal to discuss
certain areas during interrogation. —

The defendant, prior to agreeing to participate in interrogation sessions, had signed a statement acknowledging his right to stop answering questions at any time and had refused to respond to questions during two sessions of interrogation at the police department. During direct examination, the prosecutor asked about those areas that he had refused to discuss, emphasized the fact that he had not denied certain aspects of the alleged assault and, in closing arguments, repeatedly directed the jury's attention to his silence when asked certain questions, thereby inviting the inference that a truthful answer would have established guilt. These statements constituted impermissible comment on the defendant's exercise of his right of silence. Brewster v. State, 712 P.2d 338,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 623

(Wyo. 1985).

Comment by defense constitutes waiver. —

Where defense attorney himself uttered the first comment upon the defendant's silence, thereby waiving the constitutional rights of the defendant, any remark which the prosecution made in rebuttal could not then be said to be in violation of the defendant's rights. Stanton v. State, 692 P.2d 947,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 355

(Wyo. 1984).

Prosecutor's comment on defendant's failure to produce a shirt in evidence did not violate his right against self-incrimination, where defendant testified about the color of his shirt and defendant's counsel attempted to impeach the state's witnesses by cross-examination on that subject. De Sersa v. State, 729 P.2d 662,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 645

(Wyo. 1986).

The prosecutor's comments concerning the defendant's silence did not constitute a violation of either the state or federal constitution, where defense counsel opened the door to the comments by repeatedly raising the issue of the defendant's cooperation. Vargas-Rocha v. State, 891 P.2d 763,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1995).

Instruction to disregard defendant's failure to testify. —

There is no clear rule of law which states that the giving of a jury instruction to disregard and draw no inference from a defendant's failure to testify is error. Quite to the contrary, there is substantial authority for the proposition that, even if unrequested, the giving of such a cautionary instruction is proper. Daellenbach v. State, 562 P.2d 679,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 245

(Wyo. 1977).

Communications between acquaintances not privileged. —

There is no constitutionally protected right upon which the right to silence rests when it involves communications between two mutual acquaintances. Abeyta v. State, 592 P.2d 705,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 388

(Wyo. 1979).

Testimony voluntarily given at coroner's inquest. —

Where, at a coroner's inquest, defendant before testifying was advised of his rights and duly cautioned, his testimony thereafter given voluntarily is admissible against him. Maki v. State, 18 Wyo. 481, 112 P. 334,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1911).

Driver's refusal to submit to chemical blood-alcohol test admissible.
—

Evidence that a person who has been arrested for driving under the influence of intoxicants has refused to submit to a chemical blood-alcohol test is admissible in cases brought in municipal courts for the violation of a municipal ordinance prohibiting the driving of an automobile while under the influence of intoxicants, as well as in state prosecutions, and does not violate the state or federal constitution.
Laramie v. Mengel, 671 P.2d 340,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 383

(Wyo. 1983).

Permissive inference from unexplained possession of stolen
property. —

Defendant's privilege against self-incrimination was not violated by instruction allowing jury to draw permissive inference, from defendant's unexplained possession of stolen car, that he knew the car was stolen. Vanvorst v. State, 1 P.3d 1223,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 2000).

Evidence obtained by lawful search. —

Receipt of evidence obtained by lawful search is not forcing defendant to testify against himself. State v. George, 32 Wyo. 223, 231 P. 683,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1924).

Search incident to arrest. —

An officer has right to search a party arrested and take from his person and possession, and from handbags, sacks, and other things that he carries with him, and from any place to which lawful access has been obtained, property reasonably believed to be connected with a crime and the fruits, means, or evidence thereof, and may take property of evidentiary value shown him by the prisoner, and he may take and hold them to be disposed of as the court directs, notwithstanding this section. Wiggin v. State, 28 Wyo. 480, 206 P. 373,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1922).

Consent to warrantless search. —

In order to show consent to search without warrant which would otherwise be illegal, testimony must show that the consent was really voluntary with a desire to invite search, and not merely to avoid resistance. Tobin v. State, 36 Wyo. 368, 255 P. 788,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1927).

Inadmissibility of statement of defendant may affect introduction of evidence

seized in search to which defendant consented. Stamper v. State, 662 P.2d 82,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 301

(Wyo. 1983).

Propriety of admitting prior criminal convictions for impeachment
purposes depends upon defendant's testimony. —

Since the defendant did not testify, he did not preserve on appeal the issue of the propriety of the pretrial ruling that his 17-year-old criminal convictions would be admissible for impeachment purposes. To balance the probative value with the prejudicial effect of a prior conviction, the court had to know the precise nature of the defendant's testimony. Additionally, such a ruling did not violate the defendant's constitutional right to remain silent. Vaupel v. State, 708 P.2d 1248,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 627

(Wyo. 1985).

Double jeopardy clause has same meaning as fifth amendment.
—

While the respective double jeopardy provisions of the Wyoming state constitution and the fifth amendment to the federal constitution are dissimilar in language, they have the same meaning and are coextensive in application. Vigil v. State, 563 P.2d 1344,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 252

(Wyo. 1977); Hopkinson v. State, 664 P.2d 43,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 464 U.S. 908, 104 S. Ct. 262, 78 L. Ed. 2d 246 (U.S. 1983).
